Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 50-1201 to 50-1216 shall be known and may be cited as the Legislative Performance Audit Act.

Laws 1992, LB 988, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 607, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 82.